Utah statutes.
4-11-6.   Hives to have removable frames -- Consent of county bee inspector to sell or transport diseased bees.

(1)  A person may not house or keep bees in a hive unless it is equipped with movable frames to all its parts so that access to the hive can be had without difficulty.

(2)  No person who owns or has possession of bees (whether queens or workers) with knowledge that they are infected with terminal disease, parasites, or pests, or with knowledge that they have been exposed to terminal disease, parasites, or pests, shall sell, barter, give away, or move the bees, colonies, or apiary equipment without the consent of the county bee inspector or the department.



Amended by Chapter 73, 2010 General Session

